Illinois, session 104th, HB4828.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 10-85 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-85 new)7    Sec. 10-85. Fiscal Year 2027 housing assistance payments; 8long-term care residents. All housing assistance payments 9payable from funds appropriated to the Department in State 10Fiscal Year 2027 for the purpose of providing ongoing housing 11assistance to long-term care residents seeking to transition 12to less restrictive community housing shall be structured to 13ensure that housing assistance recipients pay no more than 30% 14of their income as housing costs and may relocate to a 15different residence that meets applicable Department rules 16without losing eligibility for such housing assistance 17payments.  18    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 192026.